District of Columbia statutes.
51-124

Severability.

If any provisions of this subchapter, or the application thereof to any person or circumstances, is held invalid, the remainder of the subchapter, and the application of such provision to other persons or circumstances, shall not be affected thereby.

Aug. 28, 1935, 49 Stat. 956, ch. 794, § 24
June 4, 1943, 57 Stat. 125, ch. 117, § 1
1981 Ed., § 46-125.
1973 Ed., § 46-324.